Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 3. Powers of Commission in Relation to Service.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 21.

§ 56-246.
Tests and equipment therefor.

The Commission may purchase such materials, apparatus and standard measuring instruments for such examinations and tests as it may deem necessary, and may provide for the examinations and testing of the service or any part thereof of any public utility
in this Commonwealth at such time and under such circumstances as the Commission may deem best.

History.
Code 1919, § 4069.

§ 56-247.
Commission may change regulations, measurements, practices, services, or acts.

If upon investigation it shall be found that any regulation, measurement, practice, act or service of any public utility complained of is unjust, unreasonable, insufficient, preferential, unjustly discriminatory or otherwise in violation of law or if
it be found that any service is inadequate or that any reasonable service cannot be obtained, the Commission may substitute therefor such other regulations, measurements, practices, service or acts and make such order respecting, and
such changes in, such regulations, measurements, practices, service or acts as shall be just and reasonable.

The Commission shall investigate the promotional allowances and practices of public utilities and shall take such action as such investigation may indicate to be in the public interest.

History.
Code 1919, § 4072; 1966, c. 552.

Cross references.

As to exemption of certain electrical cooperatives from regulations of Commission, see § 56-231.50.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, c. 633, cl. 1 provides: “The State Corporation Commission and those parties involved in electric generating and transmission facilities and the sale of electricity in Virginia shall work together to strive to establish one or more independent
system operators and one or more regional power exchanges that serve the public interest in the Commonwealth by January 1, 2001.”

Law Review.

For note on the application of the Parker antitrust exemption afforded state-regulated conduct, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1511 (1972).

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

§ 56-247.1.
Commission to require public utilities to follow certain procedures.

The Commission shall require that public utilities adhere to the following procedures for services not found to be competitive:

Every public utility shall provide its residential customers one full billing period to pay for one month’s local or basic services, before initiating any proceeding against a residential customer for nonpayment of local service.

Pay the residential customer a fair rate of interest as determined by the Commission on money deposited and return the deposit with the interest after not more than one year of satisfactory credit has been established.

Every public utility shall establish customer complaint procedures that will ensure prompt and effective handling of all customer inquiries, service requests, and complaints. Such procedure shall be approved by the Commission before its implementation
and it shall be distributed to its residential customers. The utility shall disclose to the customer that the Commission is the responsible regulatory agency and that the customer may contact the Commission on regulatory
matters and provide the customer with the contact information for the Commission.

No electric or gas utility shall terminate a customer’s service without 10 days’ notice by mail to the customer.

No public utility shall terminate the residential service of a customer for such customer’s nonpayment of basic nonresidential services as defined by its terms and conditions on file with the Virginia State Corporation Commission.

A public utility providing water service shall not terminate service for nonpayment until it first sends the customer written notice by mail 10 days in advance of making the termination but, in no event, shall it terminate the customer’s service until
20 days after the customer’s bill has become due. Any such notice shall also include contact information for the customer’s use in contacting the public utility regarding the notice.

Any electric utility formed under or subject to Chapter 9.1 (§ 56-231.15 et seq.) may install and operate, upon a customer’s request and pursuant to an appropriate tariff for any type or classification of service, a prepaid metering equipment and system
that is configured to terminate electric service immediately and automatically when the customer has incurred charges for electric service equal to the customer’s prepayments for such service. Subdivisions 1, 2, 4, and
5 shall not apply to services provided pursuant to electric service provided on a prepaid basis by a prepaid metering equipment and system pursuant to this subsection. Such tariffs shall be filed with the Commission for
its review and determination that the tariff is not contrary to the public interest.

No electric utility shall terminate the residential service of a customer for such customer’s nonpayment for metered services when the electric utility believes that the customer is receiving or has received electric utility services for which the customer
was not properly billed as the result of tampering with the electric utility’s meter in a manner that prevented the meter from accurately recording usage, until the electric utility has complied with the procedure set forth
in subsection C. However, the requirement that the electric utility comply with the procedure set forth in subsection C before terminating service shall not apply if (i) the condition of a customer’s wiring, equipment,
or appliances is either unsafe or unsuitable for receiving the electric utility service; (ii) the customer’s use of the electric utility service or equipment interferes with or may be detrimental to the electric utility’s
facilities or to the provision of electric utility service by the electric utility to any other customer; (iii) a tamper-evident meter seal securing the meter is broken, damaged, or missing; (iv) electric service is furnished
over a line that is not owned or leased by the electric utility and the line is either not in a safe and suitable condition or is inadequate to receive electric utility service; (v) emergency repairs or alterations are
needed; (vi) there are unavoidable shortages or interruptions in a supply of utility service; (vii) the electric utility is acting upon orders from an authority having jurisdiction; or (viii) the actions taken are to preserve
life or property, or to avoid or abate utility or fire hazard.

Any and all Commission rules and regulations concerning the denial of telephone service for nonpayment of such service shall not apply to services found to be competitive.

If an electric utility believes that a customer is receiving or has received electric utility services for which the customer was not properly billed as the result of tampering with the electric utility’s meter in a manner that prevented the meter from
accurately recording usage, the electric utility shall (i) retrieve the meter from the customer’s premises, which may be done without providing prior notice to the customer; (ii) immediately replace it with a new meter; and (iii)
determine whether the meter has been tampered with. Within 60 days after any such determination of meter tampering has been made, the electric utility shall provide evidence of such tampering to the customer. If, after determining
the meter has been tampered with, the electric utility seeks payment for electric utility services not properly billed, the electric utility shall provide the customer with an invoice with a reasonable and final estimate of the
amount owed by the customer as a result of the meter’s failure to accurately record the customer’s usage. The invoice shall explain the electric utility’s calculation of the estimated amount owed as a result of any suspected failure.
The electric utility shall provide the customer one full billing period to pay the amount billed in such invoice before initiating any proceeding against the customer for nonpayment. During such billing period, the customer may
submit an informal complaint to the Commission disputing the amount sought by the utility. The customer may commence a formal proceeding after the informal complaint process has been exhausted in accordance with Commission regulations.

History.
1976, c. 738; 1977, c. 59; 1980, c. 415; 2010, c. 320; 2011, cc. 500, 738, 740; 2020, c. 668.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 500, cl. 2 provides: “§ 1. That the State Corporation Commission, in order to promote public health and safety, shall conduct a proceeding for the purpose of establishing limitations on the authority of a public utility providing water service
to terminate water service to the residence of any customer who provides the certification of a licensed physician that the customer has a serious medical condition or the customer resides with a family member with a serious medical
condition. The limitations shall be consistent with the public interest. In the proceeding establishing such limitations, the State Corporation Commission shall consult with the Commissioner of Health, the Commissioner of Social Services,
the Virginia Poverty Law Center, the Virginia League of Social Services Executives, water utilities, and any other persons that the State Corporation Commission deems appropriate. As a part of the proceeding, the State Corporation
Commission shall adopt regulations to implement such limitations. The regulations shall (i) be adopted in accordance with the Commission’s Rules of Practice and Procedure, (ii) be effective not later than October 31, 2011, (iii) establish
a cost recovery mechanism under which water utilities shall be authorized to recover, from approved rates collected from other customers or other sources of revenue, any losses on customer accounts the balance of which is written off
or otherwise determined to be uncollectible as the result of the implementation of the regulations, and (iv) define ‘serious medical condition.’ ”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 320 added subsection F and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 500 added subsection F [now subdivision A 6] and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and inserted the subsection A designation and “for services not found to be competitive” at the end of the introductory language; redesignated former subsections A through G, as present subdivisions
A 1 to A 7; substituted “Subdivisions 1, 2, 4, and 5” for “Subsections A, B, D, and E” in the next-to-last sentence of subdivision A 6 [now A 7]; and added subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 668, in subdivision A 3, substituted “that will ensure” for “which will insure” in the first sentence and added the last sentence; and added subdivision A 8 and subsection C.

§ 56-248.
Commission to prescribe standard units of products or service.

The Commission shall ascertain and prescribe for each kind of public utility suitable standard commercial units of products or service. This section shall not apply to telephone companies.

History.
Code 1919, § 4070; 2011, cc. 738, 740.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and added the last sentence.

§ 56-248.1.
Commission to monitor fuel prices and utility fuel purchases; fuel price index.

The Commission shall monitor all fuel purchases, transportation costs, and contracts for such purchases of a utility to ascertain that all feasible economies are being utilized. Subject to the provisions of § 56-234, the Commission shall allow natural
gas utilities to include in their fuel portfolios supplemental or substitute forms of gas sources that meet the natural gas utility’s pipeline quality gas standards and that reduce the emissions intensity of its fuel portfolio.
A natural gas utility shall procure supplemental or substitute forms of gas sources utilizing standard industry practices and shall report to the Commission annually the imputed reduction in carbon dioxide equivalent resulting
from such purchasing practices.

As used in this section:

“Biogas” means a mixture of hydrocarbons that is a gas at 60 degrees Fahrenheit and one atmosphere of pressure that is produced through the anaerobic digestion or thermal conversion of organic matter.

“Low-emission natural gas” means natural gas produced from a geologic source that has a methane intensity of 0.20 or less (i) as reported under a protocol approved by the federal Environmental Protection Agency’s Gas STAR Methane Challenge, (ii) as certified
by the United Nations Environment Programme’s Oil and Gas Methane Partnership 2.0, or (iii) as validated under a Qualified Attribute Commodities Platform.

“Methane intensity” means the methane emissions assigned to natural gas on an energy basis divided by the total methane content of produced natural gas.

“Qualified Attribute Commodities Platform” means a trading mechanism for natural gas or natural gas attributes that are nonfinancial intangible commodities that represents, packages, and certifies the qualifying attributes of an amount of low-emission
natural gas. A Qualified Attribute Commodities Platform provides validation by an independent third party, provides natural gas or natural gas attributes capable of bilateral or exchange contract trading pursuant to standardized
contracts for physical delivery that reasonably eliminate validation risk, and provides transparency for audit and reporting purposes.

“Supplemental or substitute forms of gas sources” means (i) low-emission natural gas, (ii) biogas, or (iii) hydrogen.

In addition, the Commission shall establish a fuel price index in order to compare the prices paid for the various types of fuel by Virginia utilities with the average price of the various types of fuel paid by other public utilities at comparable geographic
locations in the market.

This section shall not apply to telephone companies.

History.
1976, c. 507; 1982, c. 107; 2011, cc. 738, 740; 2022, cc. 728, 759.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and added the last sentence in the last paragraph.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 728 and 759 are identical, and added the subsections A, C and D designations; added the second and third sentences of subsection A; and added subsection B.

Law Review.

For discussion of this section in the survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1360 (1976).

§ 56-249.
Reports by utilities.

The Commission, with or without an investigation, may require any public utility to furnish to it in such form, at such times, and in such detail as the Commission shall require, such accounts, reports and other information of whatsoever kind or character
as it may deem proper and in such form and detail as it may prescribe, in order to show completely the entire operation of the public utility in furnishing the unit of its product or service to the public.

History.
Code 1919, § 4070.

Cross references.

As to exemption of certain electrical cooperatives from the provisions of §§ 56-249 through 56-249.6, see § 56-231.50.

As to filing schedule of rates, see § 56-236.

§ 56-249.1.
Commission may require transfer of gas, water or electricity by one utility to another; compensation.

The Commission may require a public utility to transfer to another public utility of like business, gas, water or electricity, whenever the public health, welfare or safety shall be found to so require; provided, however, that the transferring public
utility shall be compensated, at a rate fixed by the Commission, for all such deliveries by the receiving public utility.

History.
1975, c. 358.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1632 (1975).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 18.

§ 56-249.2.
Certain records to be maintained.

All public utilities doing business in the Commonwealth that file a rate of return statement shall, on and after January 1, 1977, or the beginning of the next fiscal year of the public utility after such date, maintain all records necessary to prepare
and submit annually a rate of return statement reflecting that part of its total business under regulation of the Commission.

History.
1976, c. 742; 1979, c. 617; 2011, cc. 738, 740.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and substituted “the Commonwealth that file a rate of return statement” for “this State.”

§ 56-249.3.
Certain electric utilities to file reports in relation to fuel transactions, fuel purchases, fuel adjustment clauses, etc.

The Commission shall require that public electric utilities, owning and operating generating facilities, or privately owned utilities purchasing power at wholesale for retail sales within this State, file monthly with the Commission for its review such
information as it may deem necessary, which may include the following:

The various types of fuels received such as coal, oil, nuclear fuel or natural gas;

The following information on fossil fuels:

The supplier of the fossil fuel, the cost in cents per MBTU of the fuel, with a notation of whether the fuel was contracted for, purchased on the spot market or purchased from an affiliate of the electric utility;

The quantities of the various types of fossil fuels received stated in tons of coal, barrels of oil, millions of cubic feet of natural gas;

The average BTU content per pound, gallon or cubic foot received, whichever is applicable;

The average sulfur and ash content, where applicable, of the fuel received;

Total demurrage charges incurred at each generating plant;

Total cost of transportation incurred at each generating plant;

The quantity of fuel consumed by each generation unit in the generating plant;

The average cost of the fossil and nuclear fuel in cents per MBTU’s consumed at each plant with and without handling charges;

The monthly net heat rate expressed in BTU’s per kilowatt-hour for each generating unit;

The kilowatt-hour output delivered into the system on a monthly basis;

The monthly net kilowatt-hour interchange; and

The monthly system kilowatt-hour sales.

History.
1977, c. 125; 1979, c. 617.

§ 56-249.4.
How reports shall be filed; reports open to public; rules and regulations.

The information filed pursuant to § 56-249.3 shall be filed with the Commission in affidavit form within forty-five days following the close of the reference month.

All such information and reports filed pursuant to this section and § 56-249.3 shall be open to the public and available for inspection.

The Commission shall promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to implement this section and § 56-249.3.

History.
1977, c. 125; 1982, c. 107.

§ 56-249.5.
Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 492.

§ 56-249.6.
Recovery of fuel and purchased power costs.

Each electric utility that purchases fuel for the generation of electricity or purchases power and that was not, as of July 1, 1999, bound by a rate case settlement adopted by the Commission that extended in its application beyond January 1, 2002, shall
submit to the Commission its estimate of fuel costs, including the cost of purchased power, for the 12-month period beginning on the date prescribed by the Commission. Upon investigation of such estimates and hearings in
accordance with law, the Commission shall direct each company to place in effect tariff provisions designed to recover the fuel costs determined by the Commission to be appropriate for that period, adjusted for any over-recovery
or under-recovery of fuel costs previously incurred. A. 1. Each electric utility that purchases fuel for the generation of electricity or purchases power and that was not, as of July 1, 1999, bound by a rate case settlement
adopted by the Commission that extended in its application beyond January 1, 2002, shall submit to the Commission its estimate of fuel costs, including the cost of purchased power, for the 12-month period beginning on the
date prescribed by the Commission. Upon investigation of such estimates and hearings in accordance with law, the Commission shall direct each company to place in effect tariff provisions designed to recover the fuel costs
determined by the Commission to be appropriate for that period, adjusted for any over-recovery or under-recovery of fuel costs previously incurred.

The Commission shall continuously review fuel costs and if it finds that any utility described in subdivision A 1 is in an over-recovery position by more than five percent, or likely to be so, it may reduce the fuel cost tariffs to correct the over-recovery.

Beginning July 1, 2009, for all utilities described in subdivision A 1 and subsection B, if the Commission approves any increase in fuel factor charges pursuant to this section that would increase the total rates of the residential class of customers
of any such utility by more than 20 percent, the Commission, within six months following the effective date of such increase, shall review fuel costs, and if the Commission finds that the utility is, or is likely to be,
in an over-recovery position with respect to fuel costs for the 12-month period for which the increase in fuel factor charges was approved by more than five percent, it may reduce the utility’s fuel cost tariffs to correct
the over-recovery.

All fuel costs recovery tariff provisions in effect on January 1, 2004, for any electric utility that purchases fuel for the generation of electricity and that was, as of July 1, 1999, bound by a rate case settlement adopted by the Commission that extended
in its application beyond January 1, 2002, shall remain in effect until the later of (i) July 1, 2007 or (ii) the establishment of tariff provisions under subsection C. Any such utility shall continue to report to the Commission
annually its actual fuel costs, including the cost of purchased power.

Each electric utility described in subsection B shall submit annually to the Commission its estimate of fuel costs, including the cost of purchased power, for successive 12-month periods beginning on July 1, 2007, and each July 1 thereafter. Upon investigation
of such estimates and hearings in accordance with law, the Commission shall direct each such utility to place in effect tariff provisions designed to recover the fuel costs determined by the Commission to be appropriate for such
periods, adjusted for any over-recovery or under-recovery of fuel costs previously incurred; however, (i) no such adjustment for any over-recovery or under-recovery of fuel costs previously incurred shall be made for any period
prior to July 1, 2007, and (ii) the Commission shall order that the deferral portion, if any, of the total increase in fuel tariffs for all classes as determined by the Commission to be appropriate for the 12-month period beginning
July 1, 2007, above the fuel tariffs previously existing, shall be deferred without interest and recovered from all classes of customers as follows: (i) in the 12-month period beginning July 1, 2008, that part of the deferral portion
of the increase in fuel tariffs that the Commission determines would increase the total rates of the residential class of customers of the utility by four percent over the level of such total rates in existence on June 30, 2008,
shall be recovered; (ii) in the 12-month period beginning July 1, 2009, that part of the balance of the deferral portion of the increase in fuel tariffs, if any, that the Commission determines would increase the total rates of
the residential class of customers of the utility by four percent over the level of such total rates in existence on June 30, 2009, shall be recovered; and (iii) in the 12-month period beginning July 1, 2010, the entire balance
of the deferral portion of the increase in fuel tariffs, if any, shall be recovered. The “deferral portion of the increase in fuel tariffs” means the portion of such increase in fuel tariffs that exceeds the amount of such increase
in fuel tariffs that the Commission determines would increase the total rates of the residential class of customers of the utility by more than four percent over the level of such total rates in existence on June 30, 2007.

In proceedings under subsections A and C:

Energy revenues associated with off-system sales of power shall be credited against fuel factor expenses in an amount equal to the total incremental fuel factor costs incurred in the production and delivery of such sales. In addition, 75 percent of the
total annual margins from off-system sales shall be credited against fuel factor expenses; however, the Commission, upon application and after notice and opportunity for hearing, may require that a smaller percentage of
such margins be so credited if it finds by clear and convincing evidence that such requirement is in the public interest. The remaining margins from off-system sales shall not be considered in the biennial reviews of electric
utilities conducted pursuant to § 56-585.1. In the event such margins result in a net loss to the electric utility, (i) no charges shall be applied to fuel factor expenses and (ii) any such net losses shall not be considered
in the biennial reviews of electric utilities conducted pursuant to § 56-585.1. For purposes of this subsection, “margins from off-system sales” shall mean the total revenues received from off-system sales transactions
less the total incremental costs incurred; and

The Commission shall disallow recovery of any fuel costs that it finds without just cause to be the result of failure of the utility to make every reasonable effort to minimize fuel costs or any decision of the utility resulting in unreasonable fuel costs,
giving due regard to reliability of service and the need to maintain reliable sources of supply, economical generation mix, generating experience of comparable facilities, and minimization of the total cost of providing
service.In any proceeding for the recovery of fuel costs under this subdivision in which the costs a utility seeks to recover include costs incurred under a natural gas capacity contract for a term of more than 10 years
that procures more than 250,000 dekatherms per day that has not previously been subject to a review under this subdivision, the Commission shall require the utility to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the utility
has (i) determined that the utility cannot meet its service obligations, giving due regard, in the Commission’s sole discretion, to reliability of service and the need to maintain reliable sources of supply, without an
additional fuel resource; (ii) reasonably identified and determined the date and amount of the new fuel resource it needs; (iii) objectively studied available alternative fuel resource options, as verified by the Commission,
including options other than a new natural gas capacity contract or contracts to meet the identified and determined need; and (iv) determined that the natural gas capacity contract or contracts are the lowest-cost available
option, taking into consideration fixed and variable costs and a reasonable projection of utilization. Absent the Commission’s finding that the utility has proven by a preponderance of the evidence that the utility had
complied with the requirements of clauses (i), (ii), (iii), and (iv), the Commission shall deny the utility’s recovery of such costs. Nothing in this subdivision shall limit the Commission’s discretion to review and make
a determination as to the reasonableness of the recovery by a utility of costs, including costs incurred under a natural gas capacity contract, that were previously subject to a review under this subdivision.

The Commission is authorized to promulgate, in accordance with the provisions of this section, all rules and regulations necessary to allow the recovery by electric utilities of all of their prudently incurred fuel costs under subsections A and C, including
the cost of purchased power, as precisely and promptly as possible, with no over-recovery or under-recovery, except as provided in subsection C, in a manner that will tend to assure public confidence and minimize abrupt changes
in charges to consumers.

History.
1978, c. 636; 1979, c. 492; 1980, c. 384; 1982, c. 584; 1984, cc. 716, 725; 1989, c. 666; 2004, c. 827; 2006, c. 939; 2007, cc. 888, 933; 2009, c. 244; 2020, c. 661.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1984, c. 725, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to applications pending on the effective date of this act [January 1, 1985].”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 827 inserted the A 1 designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and inserted the language “or purchases power . . . beyond January 1, 2002” near the beginning in subdivision A 1; inserted the A 2 designation at the beginning
of the second paragraph and inserted “described in subdivision A 1”; added subsections B and C; inserted the D 1 designation at the beginning of the former third paragraph and in subdivision D 1, added “In proceedings under subsections
A and C” at the beginning and deleted “hereunder” following “to be recovered”; inserted the D 2 designation at the beginning of the former fourth paragraph and added “In proceedings under subsections A and C” at the beginning of subdivision
D 2; inserted the D 3 designation at the beginning of the former next-to-last paragraph and in subdivision D 3, inserted “under subsections A and C” and “except as provided in subsection C”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 939 rewrote subsection C.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “later of (i) July 1, 2007 or (ii)” for “earlier of (i) July 1, 2007; (ii) the termination of capped rates pursuant to the provisions of subsection C of § 56-582; or
(iii),” and deleted “until July 1, 2007” from the end; in subsection C, deleted “Until the capped rates for such utility expire or are terminated pursuant to the provisions of § 56-582” from the beginning, substituted “and each July
1 thereafter” for “2008, and 2009, and the six month period beginning July 1, 2010,” “shall order that the deferral portion, if any of the total increase in fuel tariffs for all classes as” for “may order that up to 40% of any increase
in fuel tariffs,” and the language beginning “from all classes of customers” for “during the period from July 1, 2008, through December 31, 2010”; rewrote subsection D and made related changes; redesignated former subdivision D 3 as
present subsection E; and deleted the former final paragraph, permitting the Commission to dispense with outlined procedures under certain circumstances.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 244 added subdivision A 3.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 661 added the second paragraph of subdivision D 2.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1365 (1978).

For article, “Public Utility Law,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (2008).

§ 56-249.7.
Certain directors and officers of utility to file shareholder information.

The directors and officers of any public utility as defined in § 56-232 shall file with the Commission a record of all officers and directorships and all sources of income in excess of $25,000 per year arising from voting securities in all other corporations
which to the knowledge of the director or officer furnishes fuel with a value in excess of $50,000 per year to the public utility. Such records for the past year shall be filed or made current on or before September 1 of each year.

History.
1985, c. 522.

§ 56-250.
Commission may authorize action by public utility in time of emergency or shortage; plans.

Whenever it shall appear by satisfactory evidence that any public utility furnishing in this State power, heat, light or water cannot supply all of its customers the usual requirements of each by reason of strikes, accidents, want of fuel, or for any
other reason, the Commission may authorize such public utility to take such action as, in the opinion of the Commission, will minimize adverse impact on the public health and safety and facilitate restoration of normal service
to all customers at the earliest time practicable.

To facilitate implementation of this section, the Commission may require any such public utility to file, as a part of the rules and regulations referred to in § 56-236, its plan for curtailment of service in such a condition of emergency or shortage.
Such plans shall be considered and shall take effect in the manner provided in this chapter for the schedules of rates and charges and rules and regulations of public utilities.

History.
1920, p. 232; Michie Code 1942, § 4072a; 1974, c. 478; 1975, c. 358.

Law Review.

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 18.

§§ 56-251,
56-252.
Repealed by Acts 1974, c. 478.

§ 56-253.
Existing remedies retained.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall in any way abridge or alter the remedies at common law, in equity, or by statute, but the provisions hereof shall be deemed to be in addition to such remedies.

History.
Code 1919, § 4073.

Cross references.

As to power of the State Corporation Commission to change rates fixed by city, see § 56-481.